North Carolina, session 2025, HB391.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of two million one hundred
seventy-eight thousand dollars ($2,178,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and
the sum of four million five hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($4,542,000) in recurring funds
*H391-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to increase the number of full-time Adult Protective
Services (APS) workers statewide by at least 25 for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and by an
additional 25 for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Funds authorized by this section for the allocation of
50 additional Adult Protective Services (APS) workers shall be distributed to county departments
of social services based on the greatest need for additional APS workers, as determined by the
Division of Social Services. In determining the counties with the greatest need for additional
APS workers, the Division of Social Services, in consultation with the North Carolina
Association of County Directors of Social Services, shall consider the following factors: (i) the
total number of APS cases within the county; (ii) the number of APS workers required to
adequately assess and evaluate the APS cases in the county; (iii) the population of individuals 65
years of age or older residing in the county; and (iv) the volume of reports related to abuse,
neglect, and exploitation of older adults within each county.
SECTION 1.(b) County departments of social services that are the recipients of these
allocated funds shall not use these funds (i) for any purpose other than to pay for salaries, benefits,
and related expenses associated with the additional APS workers or (ii) to supplant any other
source of funding for staff.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 391-First Edition